Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2312.02
Termination of parental rights; effect.

(a) A parent is barred from inheriting from or through a child of the parent if the parent's parental rights were terminated and the parent-child relationship was not judicially reestablished.

(b) For the purpose of intestate succession from or through the deceased child, a parent who is barred from inheriting under this section is treated as if the parent predeceased the child.

Laws 2020, LB966, § 12.